Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1)(a) A task force to review laws related to criminal insanity and competency to stand trial is established, with members as provided in this subsection.(i) The secretary of the department of social and health services or the secretary's designee;(ii) The secretary of the department of corrections or the secretary's designee;(iii) The director of the health care authority or the director's designee;(iv) The Washington state attorney general or the attorney general's designee;(v) The director of the Washington state office of public defense or the director's designee; and(vi) Nineteen members to be appointed by the department of social and health services meeting the descriptions identified in (a)(vi)(A) through (Q) of this subsection:(A) One member representing superior courts, to be designated by the Washington state superior court judges association;(B) One member representing courts of limited jurisdiction, to be designated by the Washington state district and municipal courts judges association;(C) One member representing prosecutors, to be designated by the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;(D) One member representing trial-level criminal defense attorneys, to be designated by the Washington defender association;(E) One member representing law enforcement, to be designated by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;(F) One member representing the interests of victims, to be designated by the office of crime victims advocacy;(G) One member designated by disability rights Washington;(H) A member designated by plaintiff's counsel in A.B., by and through Trueblood, et al., v. DSHS, et al., No. 15-35462 ("Trueblood");(I) One member designated by the national alliance on mental illness Washington;(J) An independent mental health professional with expertise in forensics;(K) A representative of a medicaid managed care organization;(L) A representative of behavioral health administrative services organizations;(M) A representative of county governments, to be designated by the Washington state association of counties;(N) A representative of city governments, to be designated by the association of Washington cities;(O) A representative of western state hospital;(P) A representative of eastern state hospital; and(Q) Three individuals with direct lived experience of the forensic mental health system, including at least one person who is a former competency restoration patient and at least one person with experience of commitment related to criminal insanity.(b) The task force shall choose its cochairs from among its membership. The department of social and health services shall convene the initial meeting of the task force.(2) The task force shall undertake the following tasks:(a) A comprehensive review of the laws in chapter 10.77 RCW to modernize and clean up issues that present barriers to administration, public safety, consistency, fairness, efficiency, and comprehension by victims, committed individuals, families, and the courts;(b) Consider potential terminology and language changes to promote patient-centered language, improve coherence between legal and medical terminology, reduce stigma, and improve understanding of the competency evaluation process; and(c) Make recommendations concerning law changes that would remove barriers to diversion, promote effective treatment, and increase services that would facilitate safe and responsible hospital discharges.(3) The task force may form subcommittees to assist its work. The task force may contract with additional persons with specific technical expertise if necessary to carry out the mandates of the study. Such contracts may only be entered if an appropriation is specifically provided for this purpose.(4) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the department of social and health services. Senate committee services and the office of program research may provide support to the task force in the areas of statutory research and statutory drafting. The department of social and health services must provide reporting under RCW 43.18A.030.(5) Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026.(7) This section expires June 30, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) The code reviser shall recodify, as necessary, the following sections of chapter 10.77 RCW in the following order within chapter 10.77 RCW, using the indicated chapter headings:GeneralRCW 10.77.020RCW 10.77.027RCW 10.77.0942RCW 10.77.095RCW 10.77.097RCW 10.77.210RCW 10.77.230RCW 10.77.240RCW 10.77.250RCW 10.77.255RCW 10.77.260RCW 10.77.270RCW 10.77.275RCW 10.77.280RCW 10.77.300Authorized Leave and FurloughsRCW 10.77.145RCW 10.77.163Community NotificationsRCW 10.77.165RCW 10.77.205RCW 10.77.207Evaluations Under This ChapterRCW 10.77.060RCW 10.77.065RCW 10.77.070RCW 10.77.100Criminal InsanityRCW 10.77.025RCW 10.77.030RCW 10.77.040RCW 10.77.080RCW 10.77.091RCW 10.77.094RCW 10.77.110RCW 10.77.120RCW 10.77.132RCW 10.77.140RCW 10.77.150RCW 10.77.152RCW 10.77.155RCW 10.77.160RCW 10.77.170RCW 10.77.175RCW 10.77.180RCW 10.77.190RCW 10.77.195RCW 10.77.200RCW 10.77.220Competency to Stand TrialRCW 10.77.050RCW 10.77.068RCW 10.77.072RCW 10.77.074RCW 10.77.075RCW 10.77.079RCW 10.77.084RCW 10.77.0845RCW 10.77.086RCW 10.77.088RCW 10.77.0885RCW 10.77.089RCW 10.77.092RCW 10.77.093RCW 10.77.202RCW 10.77.320(2) The code reviser shall correct all statutory references to sections recodifed by this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. The following sections are decodified:(1) RCW 10.77.2101 (Implementation of legislative intent);(2) RCW 10.77.290 (Secretary to adopt rulesâ2015 1st sp.s. c 7);(3) RCW 10.77.310 (Health care authority contractsâCompensation of staff in outpatient competency restoration programs);(4) RCW 10.77.940 (Equal application of 1989 c 420âEvaluation for developmental disability); and(5) RCW 10.77.950 (ConstructionâChapter applicable to state registered domestic partnershipsâ2009 c 521).--- END ---